Washington statutes.
RCW 41.58.803

Continuation and savings.

On January 1, 1976, all rules and regulations, and all business pending before the agencies or divisions thereof from whom functions are transferred pursuant to chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. and which pertain to such functions shall be continued and acted upon by the commission. All existing contracts and obligations pertaining to such functions shall remain in full force and effect, but shall be performed by the commission in lieu of the agency from whom the functions are transferred. The transfer of any functions shall not affect the validity of any act performed by such agency or division thereof or any officer or employee thereof prior to the effective date of the transferral of such functions.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of *this act, contracts or agreements are authorized between the commission and other agencies with respect to functions transferred from other agencies pursuant to chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. Such contract or agreement may provide for an employee or employees of such other agencies or other person or persons to continue to provide services relating to pending business which is transferred to the commission as of January 1, 1976, until such pending business is completed.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 5 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: For codification of "this act" [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 5], see Codification Tables.